Utah statutes.
16-16-110.   Relation to restraint of trade and antitrust laws.
To the extent a limited cooperative association or activities conducted by the
association in this state meet the material requirements for other
cooperatives entitled to an exemption from or immunity under any provision of
the restraint of trade or antitrust laws of this state, the association and
its activities are entitled to the exemption or immunity.  This section does
not create any new exemption or immunity for an association or affect any
exemption or immunity provided to a cooperative organized under any other law.
